New Mexico, session 2026, HB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 74-1-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1971, Chapter 277, Section 3, as amended) is amended to read: "74-1-3. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Environmental Improvement Act: A. "board" means the environmental improvement board; [B. "carbon intensity" means the quantity of fuel lifecycle greenhouse gas emissions per unit of fuel energy, expressed in grams of carbon dioxide equivalent per megajoule; C.] B. "department" or "environmental improvement department" means the department of environment; [D. "fuel lifecycle" means an assessment of the aggregate greenhouse gas emissions based on science-based models or protocols, including direct emissions and significant indirect emissions from indirect land use change, all stages of fuel and feedstock production and distribution, feedstock generation or extraction through the distribution, delivery and use of the finished fuel by the consumer, including consideration of storage, transportation and combustion; E.] C. "on-site liquid waste system" means a liquid waste system, or part thereof, serving a dwelling, establishment or group, and using a liquid waste treatment unit designed to receive liquid waste followed by either a soil treatment or other type of disposal system. "On-site liquid waste system" includes holding tanks and privies but does not include systems or facilities designed to receive or treat mine or mill tailings or wastes; [F.] D. "person" means the state or [any] an agency, an institution or a political subdivision thereof, [any] a public or private corporation, an individual, a partnership, an association or other entity and includes [any] an officer or a governing or managing body of [any] a political subdivision or a public or private corporation; [G.] E. "residential on-site liquid waste system" means an on-site liquid waste system serving up to four dwelling units; and [H.] F. "secretary" means the secretary of environment [and I. "transportation fuel" means electricity or a liquid, gaseous or blended fuel, including gasoline, diesel, liquefied petroleum gas, natural gas and hydrogen, sold, supplied, used or offered for sale to power vehicles or equipment for the purposes of transportation]." SECTION 2. Section 74-1-7 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1971, Chapter 277, Section 10, as amended) is amended to read: "74-1-7. DEPARTMENT--DUTIES.-- A. The department is responsible for environmental management and consumer protection programs. In that respect, the department shall maintain, develop and enforce rules and standards in the following areas: (1) food protection; (2) water supply, including implementing a capacity development program to assist water systems in acquiring and maintaining technical, managerial and financial capacity in accordance with Section 1420 of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act of 1974 and establishing administrative penalties for enforcement; (3) liquid waste, including exclusive authority to collect on-site liquid waste system fees that are no more than the average charged by the contiguous states to New Mexico for similar permits and services and to implement and administer an inspection and permitting program for on-site liquid waste systems; (4) air quality management as provided in the Air Quality Control Act; (5) radiation control and collection of license, registration and other related fees as provided in the Radiation Protection Act; (6) noise control; (7) nuisance abatement; (8) vector control; (9) occupational health and safety as provided in the Occupational Health and Safety Act; (10) sanitation of public swimming pools and public baths; (11) plumbing, drainage, ventilation and sanitation of public buildings in the interest of public health; (12) medical radiation, health and safety certification and standards for radiologic technologists as provided in the Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Health and Safety Act; (13) hazardous wastes and underground storage tanks as provided in the Hazardous Waste Act; and (14) solid waste as provided in the Solid Waste Act [and (15) carbon intensity of transportation fuels as provided in Section 4 of this 2024 act, including registration and related fees]. B. Nothing in Subsection A of this section imposes requirements for the approval of subdivision plats in addition to those required elsewhere by law. Nothing in Subsection A of this section preempts the authority of [any] a political subdivision to approve subdivision plats." SECTION 3. Section 74-1-8 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1971, Chapter 277, Section 11, as amended) is amended to read: "74-1-8. BOARD--DUTIES.-- A. The board is responsible for environmental management and consumer protection. In that respect, the board shall promulgate rules and standards in the following areas: (1) food protection; (2) water supply, including a capacity development program to assist water systems in acquiring and maintaining technical, managerial and financial capacity in accordance with Section 1420 of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act of 1974 and rules authorizing imposition of administrative penalties for enforcement; (3) liquid waste, including exclusive authority to establish on-site liquid waste system fees that are no more than the average charged by the contiguous states to New Mexico for similar permits and services and to implement and administer an inspection and permitting program for on-site liquid waste systems; (4) air quality management as provided in the Air Quality Control Act; (5) radiation control and establishment of license and registration and other related fees not to exceed fees charged by the United States nuclear regulatory commission for similar licenses as provided in the Radiation Protection Act; (6) noise control; (7) nuisance abatement; (8) vector control; (9) occupational health and safety as provided in the Occupational Health and Safety Act; (10) sanitation of public swimming pools and public baths; (11) plumbing, drainage, ventilation and sanitation of public buildings in the interest of public health; (12) medical radiation, health and safety certification and standards for radiologic technologists as provided in the Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Health and Safety Act; (13) hazardous wastes and underground storage tanks as provided in the Hazardous Waste Act; and (14) solid waste as provided in the Solid Waste Act [and (15) carbon intensity of transportation fuels as provided in Section 4 of this 2024 act]. B. Nothing in Subsection A of this section imposes requirements for the approval of subdivision plats in addition to those required elsewhere by law. Nothing in Subsection A of this section preempts the authority of [any] a political subdivision to approve subdivision plats. C. Administrative penalties collected pursuant to Paragraph (2) of Subsection A of this section shall be deposited in the water conservation fund. D. On-site liquid waste system fees shall be deposited in the environmental health fund. E. Radiation license and registration and other related fees shall be deposited in the radiation protection fund." SECTION 4. A new section of the Environmental Improvement Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] RULES FOR CLEAN TRANSPORTATION FUEL STANDARD PROHIBITED.--The board shall not adopt or continue in effect a rule providing for a clean transportation fuel standard." SECTION 5. REPEAL.--Section 74-1-18 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2024, Chapter 54, Section 4) is repealed. - 8 -